Hawaii statutes.
[§291C-17] Written reports of accidents.
Written reports of accidents by drivers, owners, and occupants of vehicles
involved in accidents shall be furnished in compliance with the requirements of
chapter 287. [L 1971, c 150, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next